California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(a) When a veteran has been authorized by the department to select a farm or home, the veteran shall submit that selection for approval, as the department prescribes. The department shall have the sole responsibility for the underwriting and approval of all farm or home loans, subject to this article.

(b) In order to achieve efficient processing and approval of loans, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) The department shall establish all systems, procedures, technologies, and guidelines necessary to achieve efficient processing of farm or home loans submitted for approval by the department, with the intent of achieving loan delivery within the
 industry standard average number of days. These shall include, but may not be limited to, systems and technologies for the electronic transfer of loan funds and related fees.

(2) The department may ensure optimal participation of qualified mortgage brokers and other qualified financial institutions and shall review, standardize, and where possible simplify, the documentation required of mortgage brokers and other qualified financial institutions. The department shall provide adequate training of participating mortgage brokers and other qualified financial institutions.

(3) The department shall establish an outreach program to effectively disseminate program information to professional real estate and mortgage broker associations.

(4) The department, within the financial constraints of the program, shall offer broker
 compensation and fees sufficient to ensure optimal participation of the private sector in the loan origination process and consistent with the veteran borrower’s interest in efficient and economical loan processing.

(5) The department shall provide access over the internet to veteran applicants and their authorized agents to enable loan applications to be filed electronically.

(6) In cooperation with the Office of Administrative Law, the department shall maintain regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section and Section 987.67.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 8.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.60.

The department may acquire the farm or home, or may provide financing so that a veteran may acquire the farm or home, from its owner or may contract with a veteran for the construction of a dwelling and other improvements for a farm or home, upon the terms agreed under all of the following terms and conditions:

(a) The department is satisfied of the desirability of the property submitted.

(b) The veteran has agreed with the department that they, or members of their immediate family, will actually reside on the property within 60 days from the date of purchase or, if the residence on the property is not complete on the date of purchase, within 60 days after the residence is completed, and will continue to reside on the
 property until all payments due the department have been paid or the farm or home is sold, except where the occupancy requirement is waived pursuant to Section 987.62.

(c) If the department is to contract with a veteran for the construction of a dwelling and other buildings, or for the purchase of a mobilehome, all of the following are required:

(1) The veteran shall be the owner of the real property on which the dwelling and other buildings are to be constructed, or shall be the owner of the real property or shall be the owner of an undivided interest in common in a portion of a parcel of real property on which a mobilehome or cooperative dwelling unit is to be situated, and agrees to convey that property to the department or to allow the department to perfect a security interest in which the property is pledged as collateral in order to secure financing without unnecessary
 cost.

(2) The veteran has paid a reasonable fee set by the department to cover the cost of any preliminary service of the department that may be necessary to process the application.

(3) The veteran has filed with the department adequate plans and specifications for the improvements to be constructed upon the real property, together with a contract, executed by a contractor licensed by the State of California for the construction of the improvements in accordance with the plans and specifications within 12 months after the acquisition of the property by the department. The department may require a bond or other security instrument executed by the contractor in an amount determined by the department providing for compliance with the terms of the contract and for the payment of persons furnishing material or labor on the job, executed by a surety company, or other financial
 institution, authorized to do business in the State of California. The department may also require course-of-construction insurance for public liability, property damage, and workers’ compensation.

(4) The plans, specifications, contract, and other required documents or security instruments are approved by the department.

(5) The veteran has placed in escrow all sums of money to be advanced by the veteran, where the cost is in excess of the maximum that may be expended by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 9.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.601.

(a) For purposes of the construction of a dwelling house or other improvements for a farm or home or the acquisition of a farm or home for an Indian veteran pursuant to this article, references to property or real property include the Indian veteran’s beneficial interest in trust land held by the United States for that veteran and a leasehold interest acquired by the Indian veteran from an Indian beneficiary when the Indian veteran is not a beneficiary of trust land; references to the purchase or acquisition of property or real property include the assignment of an Indian veteran’s beneficial interest in trust land held by the
 United States for that veteran and a leasehold interest in trust land acquired by an Indian veteran from an Indian beneficiary; references to the sale of property or real property include the assignment of an Indian veteran’s beneficial interest in trust land held by the United States for that veteran and a leasehold interest in trust land acquired by the Indian member from an Indian beneficiary; and references to purchaser, seller, purchase price, and selling price refer to the acquisition or sale of a home situated or constructed upon or a farm comprising an assignment of an Indian veteran’s beneficial interest in trust land held by the United States for that veteran or a leasehold interest in trust land acquired by the Indian veteran from an Indian beneficiary.

(b) Subject to the conditions and limitations specified in Section 987.603, the department may acquire an Indian veteran’s leasehold interest in allotment trust land, or a sufficient
 portion of the leasehold interest necessary to secure the loan, as determined by the department and the Bureau of Indian Affairs, for the purpose of entering into a contract with the Indian veteran for the acquisition of a farm or home or for the construction of a dwelling house or other improvements for a farm or home or for the purchase and installation of a mobilehome on the leasehold land.

(c) Subject to the conditions and limitations specified in Section 987.603, the department may acquire an assignment of an Indian veteran’s beneficial interest in trust land held by the United States for that veteran, or a sufficient portion of the beneficial interest necessary to secure the loan, as determined by the department and the Bureau of Indian Affairs, for the purpose of entering into a contract for the acquisition of a farm or home or for the construction of a dwelling house or other improvements for a farm or home or for the purchase of a
 mobilehome on trust land assigned to the department by the Indian veteran beneficiary.

(d) For purposes of this section, the leasehold interest to be acquired by the department shall have been granted by the person or persons for whom the land is held in trust for a term of at least 25 years renewable without notice on the same terms and conditions for an additional period of at least 25 years. The lease shall be in a form acceptable to the department and to the United States Secretary of the Interior. The Indian veteran shall satisfy the department that it and its assignees will have access to the property for the term of the lease. The Indian veteran shall assign the lease to the department without cost and shall obtain the consent of the United States Secretary of the Interior to that assignment.

(e) For purposes of this section, the beneficial interest to be assigned by the
 Indian veteran shall be assigned as security for a contract entered into pursuant to this article. The assignment shall be in a form acceptable to the department and to the United States Secretary of the Interior. The Indian beneficiary veteran shall satisfy the department that the department and its assignees will have access to the property for the term of the assignment. The beneficial interest of the Indian beneficiary veteran shall be assigned at no cost to the department and with the consent of the United States Secretary of the Interior.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 454, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

987.602.

(a) Subject to the conditions and limitations specified in Section 987.603, the department may acquire an Indian veteran’s leasehold interest in tribal trust land for the purpose of entering into a contract with the Indian veteran for the acquisition of a farm or home or for the construction of a dwelling house or other improvements for a farm or home or for the purchase and installation of a mobilehome on the leasehold land.

(b) For purposes of this section, the leasehold interest to be acquired by the department shall have been granted by the tribe for which the land is held in trust to
 the Indian veteran for a term of at least 25 years renewable without notice on the same terms and conditions for an additional period of at least 25 years. The lease shall be in a form acceptable to the tribe, the department, and the United States Secretary of the Interior, shall be duly executed in accordance with the tribe’s constitution and bylaws or other tribal laws, and shall provide that the Indian veteran and his assignees shall have access to the property for the term of the lease. The Indian veteran shall assign the lease to the department without cost and shall obtain the consents of the tribe and the United States Secretary of the Interior to that assignment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

987.603.

The department may acquire an assignment of an Indian veteran’s beneficial interest in trust land held by the United States for that veteran or a leasehold interest in trust land acquired by the Indian veteran from an Indian beneficiary and contract with an Indian veteran as provided in Sections 987.601 and 987.602 upon the terms agreed if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The department is satisfied of the desirability of the property submitted.

(b) The Indian veteran has agreed with the department that the veteran, or members of the veteran’s immediate family, will actually reside on the property within 60 days from the date of acquisition by the department, or if the residence on the property is not complete on the date of acquisition, within 60 days after the residence is completed.

(c) The sum to be expended by the department pursuant to a contract for the acquisition of a home or the construction of a dwelling and other improvements does not exceed the maximum loan amount established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 987.65. The sum to be expended by the department pursuant to a contract for the acquisition of a mobilehome on trust land or leasehold land does not exceed the
 maximum loan amount established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 987.65. The sum to be expended by the department pursuant to a contract for the acquisition of a farm on trust land or leasehold land does not exceed the maximum loan amount established pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 987.65.

(d) The Indian veteran has paid a reasonable fee set by the department to cover the cost of preliminary service of the department that may be necessary to process the application.

(e) The Indian veteran has filed with the department adequate plans and specifications for the improvements to be constructed upon the property, together with a contract executed by a contractor licensed by the State of California or by an Indian contractor approved by the department for the construction of the improvements, in accordance with the plans and specifications, within 12 months after the
 assignment of the Indian veteran’s beneficial interest or acquisition of the Indian veteran’s leasehold interest in the property by the department. The department may require a bond or other security instrument executed by the contractor in an amount determined by the department providing for compliance with the terms of the contract and for the payment of persons furnishing material or labor on the job, executed by a surety company, or other financial institution, authorized to do business in the State of California. The department may also require course-of-construction insurance for public liability, property damage, and workers’ compensation.

(f) The plans, specifications, contract, and other required documents or security instruments are approved by the department.

(g) The Indian veteran has placed in escrow all sums of money to be advanced by the veteran where the cost is in
 excess of the maximum that may be expended by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 377, Sec. 6.   (AB 1084)   Effective September 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

987.62.

(a) The department, after consummating a purchase transaction under the provisions of this article and the veteran having occupied the property as required by Section 987.60 of this article, may:

(1) Annually waive the occupancy requirement on a showing of good cause. The property financed under this article is intended to remain owner-occupied, and not become an investment, rental, or business property.

(2) Waive the occupancy requirement for any period of time if the property is a farm and if the veteran personally cultivates the property and harvests the crops or tends livestock.

(3) Annually
 waive the veteran-occupied unit of a residence with two or four units.

(b) The department shall establish standards for the occupancy waiver and shall make those standards known.

(c) The department shall waive the occupancy requirement in any case where the State Department of Health determines that health hazards on adjacent property render the farm, home, or mobilehome unsuitable for occupancy, and the waiver shall be effective as long as those conditions exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 11.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.63.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this article relating to the occupancy, leasing, letting, or subletting of a farm or home acquired pursuant to this article, the department, with respect to any veteran who after consummating a purchase of a farm or home under this article and occupying such farms or home reenters the active military, naval, or air service of the United State, may waive the occupancy requirement for the period of such active service and for a reasonable period subsequent to the termination of such active service and consent to the leasing, letting, or subletting of the farm or home during such period or periods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.64.

In the event of any conflict or difference between any provision of this article and the federal Mortgage Subsidy Bond Tax Act of 1980 (P.L. 96-499; 94 Stat. 2660), including any amendment thereto and any regulation issued thereunder, the department shall comply with that federal law or regulation to the extent necessary to maintain the tax-exempt status of any issue of its general obligation or revenue bonds. Any action taken by the department prior to the effective date of this section to effect that compliance is hereby confirmed and ratified, it having at all times been the intent of the Legislature that the tax-exempt status
 of those bonds be maintained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 420, Sec. 2.   Effective July 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

987.65.

(a) The purchase price of a home, or the sum to be expended by the department pursuant to a contract for the construction of a dwelling house and other improvements, or the purchase price of a mobilehome sited on a lot owned by the purchaser and installed on a foundation system pursuant to Section 18551 of the Health and Safety Code, or the purchase price of a mobilehome converted to a fixture and improvement to the underlying real property in a mobilehome park that has been converted to a resident-owned subdivision, cooperative, condominium, or nonprofit corporation as set forth in Section 18555 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not exceed 125 percent of the then current maximum United States Department of Veterans Affairs loan limit.

(b) The purchase price of a mobilehome that is to be sited in a mobilehome park, as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code, in addition to any assistance provided by the department to a veteran pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 987.85, may not exceed 50 percent of the Federal Housing Finance Agency conforming loan limit for the county in which the mobilehome park is located.

(c) A veteran purchasing the home may advance, subject to Section 987.64, the difference between the total price or cost of the home and the sum of the purchase price of the home and any amount the department adds, under Section 987.69, to the purchase price of the home in fixing the selling price to the veteran. Any amount of the purchase price may be provided by funds from participation contracts, revenue bonds, or other traditional funding options, including mortgage backed securities.

(d) The purchase price of a farm shall not exceed 150 percent of the limit described in subdivision (a). A veteran purchasing the farm may advance the difference between the total price of the farm, or the cost of the dwelling and improvements to be constructed on a farm under a contract, and the sum of the purchase price or contract price to the department and any amount that the department adds, under Section 987.69, to the purchase or contract price to the department in fixing the selling price of the farm to the veteran.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 12.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.655.

For a mobilehome which is to be sited in a mobilehome park as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code, the department shall charge a rate of interest higher than that which is charged to purchasers of conventional housing or of a mobilehome sited on a lot owned by the purchaser. The interest rate shall be set by the department to balance lending risk while maintaining a rate at or below the market rate for a mobilehome in a park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 13.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.656.

A mobilehome which is purchased under this act shall not be moved from its original site to any other location, without first obtaining prior authorization from the department.

Any person who moves or causes to be moved a mobilehome under this act, without first obtaining approval from the department, shall be jointly and severally liable to the department for the full amount of the mobilehome loan balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

987.67.

Except as set forth in regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 987.93 with respect to cooperative dwelling units in lieu of, or in addition to, the provisions of this section, before the purchase of any property by the department there shall be filed with the department (1) an appraisement of the market value of the property by an employee or an authorized agent of the department, (2) an appraisement of the market value of the property by either the Federal Housing Administration or the Veteran’s Administration, and in addition there may be filed with the department an appraisement of the market value of the property by an authorized appraiser of a banking corporation formed under the laws of this state or of a national banking association having a place of business in this state, or (3) an appraisement of the market value of the
 property by an appraiser licensed or certified in this state. Each appraisement shall be certified by the maker thereof. The certification shall state that it is made in good faith, and that the valuation is honestly determined and represents the bona fide opinion of the maker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 14.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.68.

The department, before consummating a purchase under the provisions of this article, shall cause the title of the property sought to be purchased to be examined and may require for that purpose an abstract, an unlimited certificate of title, or a policy of title insurance, and may refer the same to the Attorney General for his opinion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.69.

(a) The department shall then enter into a contract with the veteran for the sale of the property to the veteran. The department shall fix the selling price of the property as the purchase price thereof, as the total cost of improvements constructed, or as the value of the property, as determined by the department when the property is acquired by the department in a manner other than by purchase, to which the department may add all expenses incurred and estimated to be incurred by the department in relation thereto, inclusive of interest, administration, appraisals, examination of title, insurance premiums, mortgage guaranty fees, origination fees, incidental expenses, and the sum deemed necessary to meet unforeseen contingencies. In the case of
 real property acquired for the purpose of constructing improvements thereon, the department shall forthwith after acquiring that real property enter into the contract with the veteran authorized by this section at a selling price that does not exceed the department’s appraised value of the land, if the loan is to include the value of the land, and the amount of the department’s appraised value of the improvements to be constructed thereon and any of the other additions herein authorized. After the execution of the contract between the veteran and the department and the making of the initial payment thereon the department shall be authorized to pay the cost of the improvements contracted to be constructed on the real property, making progress payments thereon in the amounts and at those times that the department approves. The department shall, upon written request of the veteran and the veteran’s
 contractor, have authority to approve additions to or deletions from the improvements contracted to be constructed and any savings affected or added cost incurred shall be deducted from or added to the amount due the department by the veteran under the terms of their contract.

(b) The department may establish provisions under regulations
 adopted by the department pursuant to Section 987.93 with respect to cooperative dwelling units in lieu of, or in addition to, those set forth in this section.

(c) When the department enters into a contract for the sale of property on trust to an Indian veteran, the contract shall include the following conditions:

(1) The dwelling house or other improvements contracted to be constructed on trust land shall be completed in compliance with the standards of the building code applicable on the trust land. If there is no building code in force on the trust land, the applicable standards shall be those of the building code of the county in which the trust land is located.

(2) On the completion of construction, the
 Indian veteran shall provide to the department an inspection certificate from a qualified building inspector certifying that the dwelling house or other improvements comply with the standards of the building code as required by paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 77.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

987.71.

(a) The purchaser shall make an initial payment of at least 2 percent of the selling price of the property or a higher amount that shall be determined based upon the creditworthiness of the purchaser, and with consideration of their military record, employment record, financial condition, and other similar factors as determined by the department. The department may waive the initial payment in any case where the value of the property as determined by the department from an appraisal equals the amount to be paid by the department plus at least 5 percent. In the case of a purchase requiring a loan guaranty by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the department may waive the initial payment and the purchaser shall pay the loan guaranty fee, which may be added to the loan amount. The department may require the purchaser
 to pay a loan origination fee, not to exceed 1 percent of the loan amount, which may be added to the loan amount.

(b) The balance of the loan amount may be amortized over a period fixed by the department, not exceeding 40 years for farms or homes, not including cooperative housing stock related to mobilehomes, and not exceeding 30 years for mobilehomes, including cooperative housing stock related to mobilehomes, located in mobilehome parks, as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code, together with interest thereon at the rate determined by the department pursuant to Section 987.87 for these amortization purposes.

(c) The department may, in order to allow the veteran to purchase the home selected without incurring excessive monthly payments, at the time of initial purchase, postpone the commencement of payment of the principal balance for a period not to exceed five
 years if the veteran’s current income meets the standards for purchase on these terms and if the department determines, in accordance with previously established criteria for these determinations, that the veteran’s income can reasonably be expected to increase sufficiently within the five-year period to make the transition to fully amortized principal and interest payments, so long as the total term of the contract of purchase does not exceed 40 years, or 30 years where the contract relates to a mobilehome located in a mobilehome park, as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The purchaser on any installment date may pay any or all installments still remaining unpaid.

(e) In any individual case, the department may for good cause postpone, from time to time, upon terms the department determines to be proper, the payment of the whole or any part of any
 installment of the purchase price, impounds, fees, charges, or interest thereon. The amount postponed shall be due and payable upon the payment in full of the contract, or upon sale, refinance, or transfer of the farm or home. A loan may be secured by a deed of trust or, if authorized by the department, another form of security.

(f) Each installment shall include an amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest on the participation contract to which the interest of the department is subject, and any amount as may be required by a covenant or provision contained in any resolution of issuance.

(g) When a purchaser makes an initial payment of less than 20 percent of the selling price of the property, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Take prudent measures to minimize losses from loan defaults and
 loan delinquencies.

(2) (A) Ensure the continued financial solvency of the loan program by charging fees to cover the costs, as determined by the department, of any loan guaranty, primary mortgage insurance, or other similar arrangement.

(B) Fees charged under this paragraph may be included in the amount of the loan, collected in advance, or collected as part of the monthly payment.

(h) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may provide purchase assistance to purchasers with limited assets, as defined by the department, by providing a deferred-payment second loan, upon which simple interest shall be charged at a rate established by the department.

(2) A deferred-payment second loan described in paragraph
 (1) is subject to all of the following conditions:

(A) The loan may not exceed 5 percent of the selling price of the farm or home.

(B) The loan shall be secured by a deed of trust or, if authorized by the department, another form of security.

(C) The loan shall be due and payable upon the payment in full of the contract or upon the sale, refinance, or transfer of the farm or home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 15.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.72.

The provisions of Section 987.71, relative to the rate of interest to be charged to veteran purchasers do not apply to assignees of such purchasers who are not veterans, but as to such assignees the rate of interest shall be as fixed by the department, compounded at periods fixed by the department.

The action of the department in refusing to permit any assignments except as provided in this section is hereby ratified and confirmed, it having at all times been the intent of the Legislature that Section 987.71 apply to veteran purchasers only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.721.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 987.72, upon the dissolution of marriage or legal separation of a veteran contract purchaser and the veteran’s spouse, an assignment may be made in favor of the nonveteran former spouse at the same rate of interest and upon the same terms and conditions as are provided to veteran purchasers provided the veteran’s entire beneficial interest is transferred to the spouse and provided there are one or more dependent children of the veteran occupying the property and the spouse continues to reside in the home and make the payments in the same amount required by the purchase
 contract. For purposes of this subdivision, any child of the veteran who is legally adopted or who acquires a separate domicile or marries shall not be considered a dependent child. 

(b) Should the veteran retain entire beneficial interest in the property after dissolution or legal separation, the veteran may continue as purchaser provided either the veteran or the former spouse continues to occupy the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 616, Sec. 2.   Effective October 8, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

987.73.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the department in each individual case may specify the terms of the contract entered into with the purchaser, but no property sold under this article shall, voluntarily or involuntarily, by operation of law or otherwise, be transferred, assigned, encumbered, leased, let or sublet, in whole or in part, nor shall any mobilehome be removed from its original site, except in case of emergency where temporary removal is necessary to avoid potential damage, without the written consent of the department,
 until the purchaser has paid therefor in full and has complied with all the terms and conditions of this contract of purchase. The department may give its written consent to such transfers, assignments, encumbrances, leasings, lettings or sublettings, or removals, for good cause shown, subject to the interest of the department and consistent with the purposes of this article.

(b) The consent of the department shall not be required where a veteran, alone or jointly with his spouse, transfers his interest in property which is the subject of a loan agreement with the department into a revocable trust established for the benefit of the veteran or of the veteran and his spouse. 

(c) The department may consent to an assignment in favor of a nonveteran spouse if a veteran purchaser qualifies as “a person in long-term care” as defined in Section 14050.3 of the Welfare and Institutions
 Code if the department is satisfied that the interest of the veteran is adequately protected. If consent is given to the assignment, the contract shall continue at the same rate of interest and upon the same terms and conditions as are provided to veteran purchasers. Consent by the department to the assignment shall be deemed given if the assignment is pursuant to a court order, and if notice of the hearing was provided to the department at least 30 days prior to the hearing at which the court order was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

987.74.

(a) (1) All properties purchased by the department shall be covered by insurance. Except as set forth in regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 987.93 in lieu of, or in addition to, the provisions of this subdivision, with respect to cooperative dwelling units, insurance purchased by the department shall be guaranteed replacement cost coverage as described in subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 10102 of the Insurance Code against fire and other hazards for the full replacement cost of the improvements or structures, shall include limited building code upgrade as described in Section 10103 of the Insurance Code, and shall be placed with a company or companies as the department may determine from time to
 time.

(2) The department may charge purchasers a premium to cover the cost to the department for insurance obtained pursuant to this subdivision. The premium shall not exceed the actual cost to the department for the coverage provided.

(b) The contract made between the department and the purchaser shall provide that the purchaser maintain the farm or home as
 their place of residence and keep in good order and repair all buildings, fences, and other permanent improvements situated thereon. Insurance policies purchased by the department shall be obtained to insure and keep insured against fire and other hazards, all buildings, fences, and other permanent improvements on the property. All policies shall be written with any loss payable to the department and the purchaser as their interests may appear. Insurance shall be in the amount, with the insurance companies, and under the terms and conditions as may be specified by the department.

(c) Upon renewal, the department shall assist the purchaser in determining the insurance level necessary to repair or replace the damaged or destroyed dwelling with like or equivalent construction and in determining how best to purchase additional
 coverage, if desired. The purchaser shall be solely responsible for requesting
 in writing and maintaining any additional amounts of insurance necessary to protect their interest in the property, and shall bear the risk of any loss in excess of the amount of insurance in force at the time of the loss.

(d) The department shall annually send a disclosure notice to all purchasers who have residential property insurance provided through the department. The notice shall identify the type of coverage, and shall disclose all of the following in a clear and reasonable manner:

(1) The limits of liability for the structure and improvements.

(2) The amount of any deductibles.

(3) Whether the policy covers the increased costs due to
 changes in building ordinances or laws regulating construction or repair.

(4) A statement explaining the importance of having guaranteed replacement cost coverage.

(5) A statement that the policy provided by the department provides limited building code upgrade coverage and the applicable limits and restrictions to that coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 78.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

987.75.

(a) If the purchaser or, if applicable, the related stock corporation, fails or neglects to pay, satisfy, and discharge at maturity all taxes and assessments, and all other charges and encumbrances which are a lien upon the property being purchased from the department, or any part thereof, and also all taxes and assessments levied or assessed upon the interest created by the contract of purchase of such
 property; or to keep the buildings, fences, other permanent improvements upon such property insured and in good order and repair, or to keep the crops upon such property insured; or to keep in good order and repair all buildings, fences, and other permanent improvements situated upon such property; then, in such event, the department may pay, satisfy, discharge, settle, or compromise the taxes, assessments, charges, or encumbrances, or insure the buildings, fences, permanent improvements, or crops, or do the work and supply the materials necessary to keep the buildings, fences, and other improvements in good order and repair. All moneys so expended by the department shall be added to the selling price of the property and bear interest at the rate of interest designated in Section 987.71 from the date of expending the same, and shall be repaid by the purchaser to the department on demand. The department may amortize the repayment of such expenditures or permit repayment in installments upon the terms and
 conditions which it deems proper.

(b) The department may establish provisions under regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 987.93 with respect to cooperative dwelling units in lieu of, or in addition to, the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 396, Sec. 6.   (AB 1224)   Effective September 20, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

987.76.

Notwithstanding Section 6157 of the Government Code, the department shall be the sole judge of all of the following:

(a) The legality or validity of taxes, assessments, charges, insurance premiums, guaranty fees, or encumbrances, and the amount necessary to be paid in satisfaction or discharge thereof.

(b) The amount of insurance to be placed upon the buildings, fences, other permanent improvements, and crops and the amount necessary
 to be paid for the premiums for that insurance.

(c) The necessity and nature of the work required to keep the buildings, fences, and other improvements in good order and repair, and the amount to be paid therefor. 

(d) The amount of loan insurance or guaranty to be placed upon the veteran’s liability for repayment of the veteran’s contract and the amount necessary to be paid by the veteran or the department for the premiums or fees for that insurance or guaranty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 530, Sec. 4.   Effective September 17, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

987.77.
